Utah statutes.
41-22-10.5.   Local ordinances -- Designating routes -- Supervision.

(1)  A municipality or county may adopt ordinances designating certain streets and highways under its respective jurisdiction:

(a)  as open for street-legal all-terrain vehicle use;

(b)  as open for general off-highway vehicle use; or

(c)  as open for limited off-highway vehicle use to allow off-highway vehicle operators to gain direct access to or from a private or public area open for off-highway vehicle use.

(2)  A municipality or a county may adopt an ordinance requiring an operator who is under 16 years of age to be under the direct visual supervision of an adult who is at least 18 years of age while using a route designated under Subsection (1).

(3)  A route designated under Subsection (1) may not be along, across, or within the boundaries of an interstate freeway or limited access highway.

(4)  Except as provided under Section 41-22-10.3, a person may not operate an off-highway vehicle on any street or highway that is not designated or posted as open for off-highway vehicle use in accordance with Subsection (1) or Section 41-22-10.1.

(5)  Subsection (4) does not apply to off-highway implements of husbandry used in accordance with Section 41-22-5.5.

